zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 按摩滾筒配件: 瑜珈柱底座; 按摩滾筒護套; 瑜珈柱端蓋; 按摩滾筒手把; 按摩滾筒收納袋; 瑜珈柱收納推車; 瑜珈柱收納架; 按摩滾筒肩帶; 按摩滾筒壁掛支架
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 폼 롤러 부대용품: 폼 롤러 베이스; 폼 롤러 커버; 폼 롤러 엔드 캡; 폼 롤러 핸들; 폼 롤러 가방; 폼 롤러 보관 카트; 폼 롤러 보관 랙; 폼 롤러 스트랩; 벽 설치 폼 롤러
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Príslušenstvo k penovým valcom: Podstavce pod penové valce; Obaly na penové valce; Koncovky pre penové valce; Rúčky na penové valce; Vrecká na uschovanie penového valca; Vozíky na uloženie penových valcov; Stojany na uloženie penových valcov; Popruhy na penové valce; Nástenné držiaky na penové valce
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > อุปกรณ์ลูกกลิ้งโฟม: ฐานโฟมโรลเลอร์; ฝาครอบลูกกลิ้งโฟม; ฝาปิดฝั่งปลายโฟมโรลเลอร์; ด้ามจับลูกกลิ้งโฟม; กระเป๋าลูกกลิ้งโฟม; รถเข็นจัดเก็บโฟมโรลเลอร์; ชั้นวางโฟมโรลเลอร์; สายรัดลูกกลิ้งโฟม; ที่แขวนลูกกลิ้งโฟมติดผนัง
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Pěnové válce – příslušenství: Podstavce pro pěnové válce; Pěnové válce – kryty; Koncovky pěnových válců; Pěnové válce – držadla; Pouzdra na pěnové válce; Vozíky na pěnové válce; Stojany na pěnové válce; Pěnové válce – popruhy; Pěnové válce – držáky na stěnu
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 泡沫轴配件: 泡沫轴底座; 泡沫轴套; 泡沫轴端盖; 泡沫轴手柄; 泡沫轴收纳袋; 泡沫轴收纳推车; 泡沫轴收纳架; 泡沫轴带; 泡沫轴壁挂支架
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Acessórios para rolos de esponja: Bases para rolos de espuma; Capas para rolo de esponja; Tampas para rolos de espuma; Pegas para rolo de esponja; Sacos de armazenamento para rolos de esponja; Carrinhos de arrumação para rolos de espuma; Estantes de arrumação para rolos de espuma; Faixas para rolo de esponja; Suportes de parede para rolos de esponja
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Accessoires voor foamrollers: Foamrollerhouders; Hoezen voor foamrollers; Foamroller-einddoppen; Handgrepen voor foamrollers; Opbergzakken voor foamrollers; Foamroller-opbergkarren; Foamroller-opbergrekken; Bandjes voor foamrollers; Muurbevestigingen voor foamrollers
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Αξεσουάρ για χρήση με κυλίνδρους αφρού: Βάσεις foam roller; Καλύμματα για κυλίνδρους αφρού; Τάπες foam roller; Λαβές για κυλίνδρους αφρού; Τσάντες αποθήκευσης για κυλίνδρους αφρού; Καρότσια αποθήκευσης foam roller; Ράφια αποθήκευσης foam roller; Ιμάντες για κυλίνδρους αφρού; Επιτοίχιες βάσεις για κυλίνδρους αφρού
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Phụ kiện cho ống lăn: Đế con lăn giãn cơ; Vỏ ống lăn; Nắp đậy con lăn giãn cơ; Tay cầm ống lăn; Túi đựng ống lăn; Xe đẩy đựng con lăn giãn cơ; Kệ đựng con lăn giãn cơ; Dây buộc ống lăn; Giá treo tường ống lăn
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Köpük Rulo Aksesuarları: Foam roller tabanları; Köpük Rulo Kapakları; Foam roller uç kapakları; Köpük Rulo Kolları; Köpük Rulo Çantaları; Foam roller depolama arabaları; Foam roller depolama rafları; Köpük Rulo Askıları; Köpük Rulo Duvar Montaj Aparatları
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Foamroller – tilbehør: Fødder til foamrollere; Foamroller – covers; Endekapper til foamrollere; Foamroller – håndtag; Foamroller – tasker; Opbevaringsvogne til foamrollere; Opbevaringsstativer til foamrollere; Foamroller – stropper; Foamroller – vægbeslag
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Akcesoria do rollerów: Podstawy do rollerów; Pokrowce na wałki do ćwiczeń; Zaślepki do rollerów; Uchwyty wałków do ćwiczeń; Pokrowce na rollery; Wózki na rollery z pianki; Stojaki na rollery z pianki; Paski do wałków do ćwiczeń; Uchwyty ścienne do wałków do ćwiczeń
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Tillbehör till skumgummirullar: Baser för foamrollers; Skydd för skumgummirullar; Ändstycken för foamrollers; Handtag för skumgummirullar; Förvaringspåsar för skumgummirullar; Förvaringsvagnar för foamrollers; Förvaringsställ för foamrollers; Remmar för skumgummirullar; Väggfästen för skumgummirullar
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Dodatki za penaste valje: Osnove za penaste valje; Prevleke za penaste valje; Končni pokrovčki za penaste valje; Ročaji za penaste valje; Vrečke za shranjevanje penastih valjev; Vozički za shranjevanje penastih valjev; Stojala za shranjevanje penastih valjev; Trakovi za penaste valje; Stenski nosilci za penaste valje
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Tilbehør til skumruller: Baser for skumruller; Trekk til skumruller; Endestykker for skumruller; Håndtak til skumruller; Lagringsvesker til skumruller; Oppbevaringsvogner for skumruller; Oppbevaringsstativer for skumruller; Stropper til skumruller; Veggfester til skumruller
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Accesorii pentru role din spumă: Baze pentru role de spumă; Huse pentru role din spumă; Capace terminale pentru role de spumă; Mânere pentru role din spumă; Genți de depozitare pentru role din spumă; Cărucioare de depozitare pentru role de spumă; Rastele de depozitare pentru role de spumă; Curele pentru role din spumă; Suporturi de perete pentru role din spumă
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Lihashuoltorullien lisätarvikkeet: Putkirullien alustat; Lihashuoltorullien suojat; Putkirullien päädyt; Lihashuoltorullien kahvat; Lihashuoltorullien säilytyspussit; Putkirullien säilytyskärryt; Putkirullien säilytystelineet; Lihashuoltorullien hihnat; Lihashuoltorullien seinäkiinnikkeet
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Schaumroller-Zubehör: Faszienrollen-Basen; Schaumroller-Abdeckungen; Faszienrollen-Endkappen; Schaumrollergriffe; Aufbewahrungstaschen für Schaumroller; Faszienrollen-Aufbewahrungswagen; Faszienrollen-Gestelle; Schaumrollengurte; Schaumrollen-Wandhalterungen
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Accessoires pour rouleau en mousse: Bases pour rouleaux de massage; Protections pour rouleaux en mousse; Embouts pour rouleaux en mousse; Poignées pour rouleaux en mousse; Sacs pour rouleau en mousse; Chariots de rangement pour rouleaux en mousse; Supports de rangement pour rouleaux en mousse; Sangles pour rouleaux en mousse; Supports muraux pour rouleaux en mousse
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > フォームローラー関連用品: フォームローラー用ベース; フォームローラーカバー; フォームローラー用エンドキャップ; フォームローラーハンドル; フォームローラーバッグ; フォームローラー用収納カート; フォームローラー用収納ラック; フォームローラーストラップ; フォームローラー壁掛け
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Accesorios para rodillos de espuma para estiramientos: Bases para rodillos de espuma; Fundas para rodillos de espuma; Tapas para rodillos de espuma; Mangos para rodillos de espuma; Bolsas de almacenamiento para rodillos de espuma para estiramientos; Carritos de almacenamiento para rodillos de espuma; Estantes de almacenamiento para rodillos de espuma; Correas para rodillos de espuma; Soportes de pared para rodillos de espuma
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Аксесоари за фитнес валяци: Основи за ролери от пяна; Калъфи за фитнес валяци; Крайни капачки за ролери от пяна; Дръжки за фитнес валяци; Чанти за съхранение на фитнес валяци; Колички за съхранение на ролери от пяна; Етажерки за съхранение на ролери от пяна; Презрамки за фитнес валяци; Стойки за стена за фитнес валяци
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Foam Roller Accessories: Foam Roller Bases; Foam Roller Covers; Foam Roller End Caps; Foam Roller Handles; Foam Roller Storage Bags; Foam Roller Storage Carts; Foam Roller Storage Racks; Foam Roller Straps; Foam Roller Wall Mounts
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Аксессуары для массажных роликов: Базы для массажных роликов; Чехлы для массажных роликов; Заглушки для массажных роликов; Ручки для массажных роликов; Сумки для массажных роликов; Тележки для хранения массажных роликов; Стойки для хранения массажных роликов; Ремни для массажных роликов; Настенные кронштейны для массажных роликов
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Putplasčio ritinėlių priedai: Putplasčio ritinėlių stovai; Putplasčio ritinėlių apvalkalai; Putplasčio ritinėlių galiniai dangteliai; Putplasčio ritinėlių rankenos; Putplasčio ritinėlių laikymo krepšiai; Putplasčio ritinėlių laikymo vežimėliai; Putplasčio ritinėlių laikymo stovai; Putplasčio ritinėlių diržai; Putplasčio ritinėlių sieniniai laikikliai
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Habhenger-kiegészítők: SMR henger talpak; Habhengerhuzatok; SMR henger zárókupakok; Habhengerfogantyúk; Habhenger-tárolótáskák; SMR henger tárolókocsik; SMR henger tárolóállványok; Habhengerpántok; Habhenger fali konzolok
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Pribor za pjenasti valjak: Baze za pjenasti valjak; Navlake za pjenasti valjak; Završni čepovi za pjenasti valjak; Ručke za pjenasti valjak; Torbe za pohranu pjenastih valjaka; Kolica za pohranu za pjenasti valjak; Stalci za pohranu za pjenasti valjak; Naramenice za pjenasti valjak; Zidni nosači za pjenasti valjak
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Accessori per rulli fitness: Basi per rulli in schiuma; Coprirullo in schiuma; Tappi terminali per rulli in schiuma; Manici con rulli in schiuma; Sacche per rulli fitness; Carrelli porta-rulli in schiuma; Scaffali porta-rulli in schiuma; Cinghie a rulli in schiuma; Supporti da parete per rulli in schiuma
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Acessórios para rolos de espuma: Bases para rolos de espuma; Capas para rolo de espuma; Tampas para rolos de espuma; Alças para rolo de espuma; Bolsas para rolos de espuma; Carrinhos de armazenamento para rolos de espuma; Prateleiras para rolos de espuma; Tiras para rolo de espuma; Suportes de parede para rolo de espuma